Washington statutes.
RCW 16.30.060

Violations—Civil penalty.

A person who violates RCW 16.30.030 is liable for a civil penalty of not less than two hundred dollars and not more than two thousand dollars for each animal with respect to which there is a violation and for each day the violation continues.

[ 2007 c 238 s 7.]